static/hunspell/29.12.2023/bash.aff
FLAG long
SFX W08 Y 4 # V06 Indc+
SFX W08 0 ме .	+Q
SFX W08 0 се .	+Clt/сы
SFX W08 0 ҙер .	+Indf
SFX W08 0 мелер .	+Q+Indf

SFX W09 Y 4 # V08 Indc+
SFX W09 0 мө .	+Q
SFX W09 0 сө .	+Clt/сы
SFX W09 0 ҙөр .	+Indf
SFX W09 0 мөлөр .	+Q+Indf

SFX W10 Y 4 # V09 Indc+
SFX W10 0 мы .	+Q
SFX W10 0 сы .	+Clt/сы
SFX W10 0 лыр .	+Indf
SFX W10 0 мылыр .	+Q+Indf

SFX W11 Y 4 # V10 Indc+
SFX W11 0 ме .	+Q
SFX W11 0 се .	+Clt/сы
SFX W11 0 лер .	+Indf
SFX W11 0 мелер .	+Q+Indf

SFX W12 Y 4 # V11 Indc+
SFX W12 0 мо .	+Q
SFX W12 0 со .	+Clt/сы
SFX W12 0 лор .	+Indf
SFX W12 0 молор .	+Q+Indf

SFX W13 Y 4 # V12 Indc+
SFX W13 0 мө .	+Q
SFX W13 0 сө .	+Clt/сы
SFX W13 0 лөр .	+Indf
SFX W13 0 мөлөр .	+Q+Indf

SFX W14 Y 4 # V13 Indc+
SFX W14 0 мы .	+Q
SFX W14 0 сы .	+Clt/сы
SFX W14 0 тыр .	+Indf
SFX W14 0 мылыр .	+Q+Indf

SFX W15 Y 4 # V14 Indc+
SFX W15 0 ме .	+Q
SFX W15 0 се .	+Clt/сы
SFX W15 0 тер .	+Indf
SFX W15 0 мелер .	+Q+Indf

SFX W16 Y 4 # V15 Indc+
SFX W16 0 мо .	+Q
SFX W16 0 со .	+Clt/сы
SFX W16 0 тор .	+Indf
SFX W16 0 молор .	+Q+Indf

SFX W17 Y 4 # V16 Indc+
SFX W17 0 мө .	+Q
SFX W17 0 сө .	+Clt/сы
SFX W17 0 төр .	+Indf
SFX W17 0 мөлөр .	+Q+Indf

SFX W18 Y 1 # V01 Imp+
SFX W18 0 сы .	+Clt/сы

SFX W19 Y 1 # V02 Imp+
SFX W19 0 се .	+Clt/сы

SFX W20 Y 1 # V03 Imp+
SFX W20 0 со .	+Clt/сы

SFX W21 Y 1 # V04 Imp+
SFX W21 0 сө .	+Clt/сы

SFX W22 Y 1 # V05 Imp+
SFX W22 0 сы .	+Clt/сы

SFX W23 Y 1 # V06 Imp+
SFX W23 0 се .	+Clt/сы

SFX W24 Y 2 # V01 Opt+
SFX W24 0 мы .	+Q
SFX W24 0 сы .	+Clt/сы

SFX W25 Y 2 # V02 Opt+
SFX W25 0 ме .	+Q
SFX W25 0 се .	+Clt/сы

SFX W26 Y 2 # V03 Opt+
SFX W26 0 мо .	+Q
SFX W26 0 со .	+Clt/сы

SFX W27 Y 2 # V04 Opt+
SFX W27 0 мө .	+Q
SFX W27 0 сө .	+Clt/сы

SFX W28 Y 2 # V13 Opt+
SFX W28 0 мы .	+Q
SFX W28 0 сы .	+Clt/сы

SFX W29 Y 2 # V14 Opt+
SFX W29 0 ме .	+Q
SFX W29 0 се .	+Clt/сы

SFX W30 Y 2 # V15 Opt+
SFX W30 0 мо .	+Q
SFX W30 0 со .	+Clt/сы

SFX W31 Y 2 # V16 Opt+
SFX W31 0 мө .	+Q
SFX W31 0 сө .	+Clt/сы

SFX W32 Y 2 # V01 Cond+
SFX W32 0 мы .	+Q
SFX W32 0 сы .	+Clt/сы

SFX W33 Y 2 # V02 Cond+
SFX W33 0 ме .	+Q
SFX W33 0 се .	+Clt/сы

SFX W34 Y 2 # V05 Cond+
SFX W34 0 мы .	+Q
SFX W34 0 сы .	+Clt/сы

SFX W35 Y 2 # V06 Cond+
SFX W35 0 ме .	+Q
SFX W35 0 се .	+Clt/сы

SFX W36 Y 2 # V09 Cond+
SFX W36 0 мы .	+Q
SFX W36 0 сы .	+Clt/сы

SFX W37 Y 2 # V10 Cond+
SFX W37 0 ме .	+Q
SFX W37 0 се .	+Clt/сы

SFX W38 Y 2 # V13 Cond+
SFX W38 0 мы .	+Q
SFX W38 0 сы .	+Clt/сы

SFX W39 Y 2 # V14 Cond+
SFX W39 0 ме .	+Q
SFX W39 0 се .	+Clt/сы

SFX W40 Y 4 # V09 GerAfter+
SFX W40 0 мы .	+Q
SFX W40 0 сы .	+Clt/сы
SFX W40 0 лыр .	+Indf
SFX W40 0 мылыр .	+Q+Indf

SFX W41 Y 4 # V10 GerAfter+
SFX W41 0 ме .	+Q
SFX W41 0 се .	+Clt/сы
SFX W41 0 лер .	+Indf
SFX W41 0 мелер .	+Q+Indf

SFX W42 Y 4 # V13 GerAfter+
SFX W42 0 мы .	+Q
SFX W42 0 сы .	+Clt/сы
SFX W42 0 тыр .	+Indf
SFX W42 0 мылыр .	+Q+Indf

SFX W43 Y 4 # V14 GerAfter+
SFX W43 0 ме .	+Q
SFX W43 0 се .	+Clt/сы
SFX W43 0 тер .	+Indf
SFX W43 0 мелер .	+Q+Indf

SFX W44 Y 3 # V09 PrcPot+
SFX W44 0 мы .	+Q
SFX W44 0 лыр .	+Indf
SFX W44 0 мылыр .	+Q+Indf

SFX W45 Y 3 # V10 PrcPot+
SFX W45 0 ме .	+Q
SFX W45 0 лер .	+Indf
SFX W45 0 мелер .	+Q+Indf

SFX W46 Y 3 # V05 Ger+
SFX W46 0 мы .	+Q
SFX W46 0 ҙыр .	+Indf
SFX W46 0 мылыр .	+Q+Indf

SFX W47 Y 3 # V06 Ger+
SFX W47 0 ме .	+Q
SFX W47 0 ҙер .	+Indf
SFX W47 0 мелер .	+Q+Indf

SFX W48 Y 3 # V07 Ger+
SFX W48 0 мо .	+Q
SFX W48 0 ҙор .	+Indf
SFX W48 0 молор .	+Q+Indf

SFX W49 Y 3 # V08 Ger+
SFX W49 0 мө .	+Q
SFX W49 0 ҙөр .	+Indf
SFX W49 0 мөлөр .	+Q+Indf

SFX W50 Y 3 # V01 Fut+
SFX W50 0 мы .	+Q
SFX W50 0 дыр .	+Indf
SFX W50 0 сы .	+Clt/сы

SFX W51 Y 3 # V02 Fut+
SFX W51 0 ме .	+Q
SFX W51 0 дер .	+Indf
SFX W51 0 се .	+Clt/сы

SFX W52 Y 3 # V03 Fut+
SFX W52 0 мо .	+Q
SFX W52 0 дор .	+Indf
SFX W52 0 со .	+Clt/сы

SFX W53 Y 3 # V04 Fut+
SFX W53 0 мө .	+Q
SFX W53 0 дөр .	+Indf
SFX W53 0 сө .	+Clt/сы

SFX W54 Y 3 # V05 Fut+
SFX W54 0 мы .	+Q
SFX W54 0 ҙыр .	+Indf
SFX W54 0 сы .	+Clt/сы

SFX W55 Y 3 # V06 Fut+
SFX W55 0 ме .	+Q
SFX W55 0 ҙер .	+Indf
SFX W55 0 се .	+Clt/сы

SFX W56 Y 3 # V07 Fut+
SFX W56 0 мо .	+Q
SFX W56 0 ҙор .	+Indf
SFX W56 0 со .	+Clt/сы

SFX W57 Y 3 # V08 Fut+
SFX W57 0 мө .	+Q
SFX W57 0 ҙөр .	+Indf
SFX W57 0 сө .	+Clt/сы

SFX W58 Y 3 # V10 Fut+
SFX W58 0 ме .	+Q
SFX W58 0 лер .	+Indf
SFX W58 0 се .	+Clt/сы

SFX W59 Y 3 # V11 Fut+
SFX W59 0 мо .	+Q
SFX W59 0 лор .	+Indf
SFX W59 0 со .	+Clt/сы

SFX W60 Y 3 # V13 Fut+
SFX W60 0 мы .	+Q
SFX W60 0 тыр .	+Indf
SFX W60 0 сы .	+Clt/сы

SFX W61 Y 3 # V14 Fut+
SFX W61 0 ме .	+Q
SFX W61 0 тер .	+Indf
SFX W61 0 се .	+Clt/сы

SFX W62 Y 3 # V15 Fut+
SFX W62 0 мо .	+Q
SFX W62 0 тор .	+Indf
SFX W62 0 со .	+Clt/сы

SFX W63 Y 2 # V01 Opt2+
SFX W63 0 мы .	+Q
SFX W63 0 дыр .	+Indf

SFX W64 Y 2 # V02 Opt2+
SFX W64 0 ме .	+Q
SFX W64 0 дер .	+Indf

SFX W65 Y 2 # V03 Opt2+
SFX W65 0 мо .	+Q
SFX W65 0 дор .	+Indf

SFX W66 Y 2 # V04 Opt2+
SFX W66 0 мө .	+Q
SFX W66 0 дөр .	+Indf

SFX W67 Y 2 # V09 Opt2+
SFX W67 0 мы .	+Q
SFX W67 0 лыр .	+Indf

SFX W68 Y 2 # V10 Opt2+
SFX W68 0 ме .	+Q
SFX W68 0 лер .	+Indf

SFX W69 Y 2 # V11 Opt2+
SFX W69 0 мо .	+Q
SFX W69 0 лор .	+Indf

SFX W70 Y 2 # V12 Opt2+
SFX W70 0 мө .	+Q
SFX W70 0 лөр .	+Indf

SFX W71 Y 2 # V01 FutPlan+
SFX W71 0 мы .	+Q
SFX W71 0 дыр .	+Indf

SFX W72 Y 2 # V02 FutPlan+
SFX W72 0 ме .	+Q
SFX W72 0 дер .	+Indf

SFX W73 Y 2 # V05 FutPlan+
SFX W73 0 мы .	+Q
SFX W73 0 ҙыр .	+Indf

SFX W74 Y 2 # V06 FutPlan+
SFX W74 0 ме .	+Q
SFX W74 0 ҙер .	+Indf

SFX W75 Y 2 # V09 FutPlan+
SFX W75 0 мы .	+Q
SFX W75 0 лыр .	+Indf

SFX W76 Y 2 # V10 FutPlan+
SFX W76 0 ме .	+Q
SFX W76 0 лер .	+Indf

SFX W77 Y 2 # V15 FutPlan+
SFX W77 0 мо .	+Q
SFX W77 0 тор .	+Indf

SFX W78 Y 3 # V09 GerPerf+
SFX W78 0 мы .	+Q
SFX W78 0 лыр .	+Indf
SFX W78 0 сы .	+Clt/сы

SFX W79 Y 3 # V10 GerPerf+
SFX W79 0 ме .	+Q
SFX W79 0 лер .	+Indf
SFX W79 0 се .	+Clt/сы

SFX W80 Y 3 # V13 GerPerf+
SFX W80 0 мы .	+Q
SFX W80 0 тыр .	+Indf
SFX W80 0 сы .	+Clt/сы

SFX W81 Y 3 # V14 GerPerf+
SFX W81 0 ме .	+Q
SFX W81 0 тер .	+Indf
SFX W81 0 се .	+Clt/сы

SFX W82 Y 3 # V15 GerPerf+
SFX W82 0 мо .	+Q
SFX W82 0 тор .	+Indf
SFX W82 0 со .	+Clt/сы

SFX W83 Y 3 # V16 GerPerf+
SFX W83 0 мө .	+Q
SFX W83 0 төр .	+Indf
SFX W83 0 сө .	+Clt/сы

SFX W84 Y 3 # V09 Inf+
SFX W84 0 мы .	+Q
SFX W84 0 лыр .	+Indf
SFX W84 0 сы .	+Clt/сы

SFX W85 Y 3 # V10 Inf+
SFX W85 0 ме .	+Q
SFX W85 0 лер .	+Indf
SFX W85 0 се .	+Clt/сы

SFX Z01 Y 1 # звукоподражательное слово Descr
SFX Z01 0 0 .	[Descr]

SFX Z02 Y 1 # звательное слово
SFX Z02 0 0 .	[Voc]

SFX Z03 Y 1 # вводное слово
SFX Z03 0 0 .	[Ger/Sim]

SFX Z04 Y 1 # модальное слово
SFX Z04 0 0 .	[Mod]

SFX Z05 Y 1 # в функции вспомагательного глагола
SFX Z06 0 0 .	[Verb]
